Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 8

Bidding Preferences

12-4-801. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Public construction project” means and includes a public works project as defined in the Local Government Public Obligations Act of 1986, compiled in title 9, chapter 21;

“Responsible bidder” means a person who has the capacity in all respects to perform fully the contract requirements, and the integrity and reliability which will assure good faith performance; and

“Responsive bidder” means a person who has submitted a bid which conforms in all material respects to all documents, whether attached or incorporated by reference, utilized for soliciting bids.

Acts 1990, ch. 1062, § 2.

Cross-References. Advisory committee for use of the internet, title 12, ch. 3, part 11.

Distributing and posting solicitations and responses electronically, §12-3-1004.

12-4-802. Allowance of bidding preferences — Reciprocity.

Whenever the lowest responsible and responsive bidder on a public construction project in this state is a resident of another state which is contiguous to Tennessee and which allows a preference to a resident contractor of that state, a like reciprocal preference is allowed to the lowest responsible and responsive bidder on such project who is either a resident of this state or is a resident of another state which does not allow for a preference to a resident contractor of that state.

Acts 1990, ch. 1062, § 3.

Attorney General Opinions. The state or a local government may, generally, constitutionally impose residency requirements or incentives that give preferential treatment to contractors that are either residents of the state or of the area encompassing a local government. OAG 12-92, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 90 (10/3/12).